Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1075.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 4, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-459, to read: START_STATUTE33-459. Conveyance to foreign entity; prohibition; identification; foreign entity review commission; civil penalty; violation; classification; definitions A. Beginning on the effective date of this section, land in this state may not be conveyed to a hostile foreign entity without approval of the foreign ENTITY review commission ESTABLISHED PURSUANT to this section. B. A grantor in this state and the grantor's agent, including a real estate professional licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 20, shall submit to the state real estate department a valid identification of any grantee.  If the grantee is not a natural person, the grantor and the grantor's agent shall submit a valid identification of the grantee's agent and the name and principal place of business of the grantee.  The grantor, the grantor's agent and the state real estate department shall maintain a copy of the identification provided by the grantee or, if the grantee is not a natural person, the identification of the grantee's agent and the grantee's name and principal place of business. C. Identification is deemed valid unless it can be determined on its face that the identification has expired. D. The foreign ENTITY review commission is ESTABLISHED in the state real estate department consisting of the following PERSONS: 1. The commissioner of the state real estate department. 2. Two persons who are appointed by the governor. 3. One PERSON who is appointed by the PRESIDENT of the senate. 4. One PERSON who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. E. each member of the foreign entity review commission EXCEPT the commissioner of the state real estate DEPARTMENT shall serve a four-year term.  At the first meeting of the commission, the members shall elect a chairperson from among their membership.  The commission shall meet at the call of the chairperson to consider any proposed purchases, leases or SUBLEASES of land in this state by a possible hostile foreign entity as PROHIBITED by this section or as prohibited by section 37-240.  On review of the proposed transaction, the commission may vote to approve or reject the transaction, and if rejected, the proposed transaction is void. F. A person or entity that violates this section is subject to a civil penalty.  The attorney general may bring an action against a person or entity that violates this section.  The civil penalty shall be the greater of the following: 1. $250,000. 2. Fifty percent of the fair market value of the interest in real property that is the subject of the violation. G. A person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor, except as follows: 1. If any portion of the land is located within twenty-five miles of a military installation or critical infrastructure, the person is guilty of a class 6 felony. 2. If the person knowingly acted as an agent of a foreign government or received compensation or direction from a FOREIGN government, the person is guilty of a class 6 felony. H. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Foreign entity" means a foreign government, a state-controlled enterprise of a foreign government or an entity acting as an agent for a foreign government or state-controlled enterprise of a foreign government. 2. "Hostile" means a foreign entity that is listed as a threat or a country of concern by the director of national intelligence or the United States department of state. 3. "Valid identification" includes: (a) Any document that bears the photograph, name and address of the grantee or, if the grantee is not a natural person, the grantee's agent. (b) An Arizona driver license, an Arizona nonoperating identification license, a tribal enrollment card or another form of tribal identification or a United States, state or local government-issued identification. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 37-231, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE37-231. State lands subject to sale; rights reserved in lands sold; state lands not subject to sale; development agreements A. All state lands, except as otherwise provided for in this title, including all improvements made or placed on or connected with state lands, shall be subject to appraisal and sale as provided in this title. B. Any person over eighteen years of age is entitled to purchase any of the state lands except as provided in section 37-240. C. All sales, grants, deeds or patents to any state lands sold between July 9, 1954 and March 18, 1968 shall be subject to and shall contain a reservation to the this state of an undivided one-sixteenth of all oil, gases and other hydrocarbon substances, coal or stone, metals, minerals, fossils and fertilizer of every name and description, together with all uranium, all thorium, or any other material which that is or may be determined by the laws of the this state or the United States or decisions of courts to be peculiarly essential to the production of fissionable materials, whether or not of commercial value, subject to the following: 1. For the purpose of promoting To promote the sale of state lands and the more active cooperation of the owner of the soil, and to facilitate the development of its mineral resources, the this state constitutes the purchaser of the land its agent for the purposes specified in this section, and in consideration hereof, relinquishes to and vests in the purchaser of the state land an undivided fifteen-sixteenths of all oil, gas and the value thereof which may be upon on or within any state land purchased after July 9, 1954 and before March 18, 1968. 2. The purchaser of the soil may sell or lease to any person, firm or corporation the oil and gas and other minerals which that may be on or in the land, upon on terms and conditions that the purchaser and the owner deem best, subject to the provisions and reservations of this section, but the lessee or purchaser shall pay to the this state an undivided one-sixteenth of the mineral produced or the value of the mineral produced at the well or mine as determined by the state land department. 3. Upon On discovery of oil and gas in paying quantities on land adjoining state lands purchased under the authority of this section, the purchaser or the purchaser's lessee shall drill and produce all wells necessary to protect the land so purchased from drainage by wells on lands in which the this state has no royalty interest, or has a lesser royalty interest. If the purchaser or the purchaser's lessee fails to protect against such drainage, the this state, acting through the state land department, may, three months after demand therefor in writing by the state land department to such purchaser and the purchaser's lessee, may enter upon on such lands and drill all wells necessary to protect the this state against such drainage. 4. The interest reserved by the this state in any state lands sold may be committed to a drilling unit or cooperative or unit plans of development and operation of oil and gas pools with the United States, its agencies and its and their lessees and permittees, and with private owners and persons holding oil and gas leases on private lands or on state lands. The state land department may, insofar as the interest of the this state may be affected thereby, may join in and consent to any such plan on behalf of the this state. Such agreements shall provide for the equitable division on an agreed basis of the oil and gas produced from the unit, but no such agreement shall not relieve any operator from the obligation to develop reasonably the lands and leases as a whole committed thereto. The royalties to which the this state is entitled on production from land purchased under this section shall be computed only on that part of the production allocated to such tract. When the agreements made under this section provide for the return of gas to a formation underlying the unit, they may provide that no royalties are required to be paid on the gas so returned. D. State lands known to contain oil, gases and other hydrocarbon substances, geothermal resources, coal or stone, metals, minerals, fossils and fertilizer of every name and description, in paying quantities, or uranium, thorium or any other material which that is or may be determined by the laws of the this state or the United States or BY decisions of court to be peculiarly essential to the production of fissionable materials, whether or not of commercial value, and state lands adjoining lands upon on which there are producing oil, gas or geothermal wells or adjoining lands known to contain any of such substances in paying quantities, or uranium, thorium or any other material peculiarly essential to the production of fissionable materials, whether or not of commercial value, shall not be sold. The prohibition against sale shall not operate to prevent the sale of lands known to contain, in paying quantities, common variety minerals as defined in section 27-271 or to prevent the sale of lands where the this state does not own such substances, minerals or metals in the lands sought to be sold. The provisions of This subsection shall does not prohibit the sale of such lands located within the exterior boundaries of an incorporated city or town, in which case the commissioner may offer the land for sale, provided the land shall be used solely for a public purpose. Such land shall revert to the this state if it is used other than for a public purpose. E. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C of this section, all state lands sold after March 18, 1968 shall be sold with the reservation that all oil, gas, other hydrocarbon substances, helium or other substances of a gaseous nature, geothermal resources, coal, metals, minerals, fossils, fertilizer of every name and description, together with all uranium, all thorium or any other material which that is or may be determined by the laws of the United States or of this state,  or by decisions of court,  to be peculiarly essential to the production of fissionable materials, whether or not of commercial value, and the exclusive right thereto, on, in, or under such land, shall be and remain and be reserved in and retained by the this state, regardless of any sale under this section and the issuance of any certificate of purchase to any purchaser of state lands pursuant to this section, provided, that the reservation shall not include common variety minerals as defined in section 27-271, subject to the following: 1. The state land department shall adopt rules providing for the protection of the patentee or contract purchaser of state lands, or their successors in interest, and the this state of Arizona, against damage to the lands, livestock, water, crops,  or other tangible improvements on lands held by such patentee or contract purchaser, and suffered by reason of the use or occupation of such lands by lessees or permittees engaged in mining and oil, gas and geothermal resource exploration and development under leases or permits executed by the department. The state land department may, at any time, may require each of its lessees or permittees to execute a bond in a reasonable principal amount conditioned upon on payment for all such damages. 2. The mineral rights reserved to the this state in the lands sold shall be closed to entry and location as a mineral claim or claims, but the department may issue, upon on application, mineral exploration permits embracing the reserved mineral rights when such issuance is deemed in the best interest of the this state, provided that the surface owner or owners shall have the first right of refusal to acquire such mineral exploration permits. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 37-240, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE37-240. Limits on sales of state lands; foreign entity review commission; civil penalty; violation; classification; definitions A. No A person may not purchase more than six hundred forty acres of grazing land,  or more than one hundred sixty acres of agricultural land. B. No Sales, leases or subleases of state lands shall may not be made to corporations a corporation or associations association that is not qualified to transact business in the this state. C. Beginning on the effective date of this amendment to this section, sales, leases or subleases of state lands may not be made to a hostile foreign entity without the approval of The foreign entity review commission ESTABLISHED by section 33-459.  The commissioner may refer any proposed sales, leases or subleases of state lands to a foreign entity to the foreign entity review commission for review and approval as prescribed by section 33-459. D. A person or entity that violates subsection C of this section is subject to a civil penalty. The attorney general may bring an action against a person or entity that violates this section.  The civil penalty shall be the greater of the following: 1. $250,000. 2. Fifty percent of the fair market value of the interest in real property that is the subject of the violation. E. A person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor, except as follows: 1. If any portion of the land is located within twenty-five miles of a military installation or critical infrastructure, the person is guilty of a class 6 felony. 2. If the person knowingly acted as an agent of a foreign government or received compensation or direction from a FOREIGN government, the person is guilty of a class 6 felony. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Foreign entity" means a foreign government, a state-controlled enterprise of a foreign government or an entity acting as an agent for a foreign government or state-controlled enterprise of a foreign government. 2. "Hostile" means a foreign entity that is listed as a threat or a country of concern by the director of national intelligence or the United States department of state. END_STATUTE